Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,135
Temporary certificate.

The director shall have the authority to issue a temporary certificate to an operator of a wastewater treatment facility which relies on the services of one person for its operation. A temporary certificate shall be valid for a period of one year after which time such operator shall be required to become fully certified under the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 8.